Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.370

Uniformed personnel—Higher education—Right to strike not granted.

The right of uniformed personnel to engage in any strike, work slowdown, or stoppage is not granted. An employee organization recognized as the exclusive bargaining representative of uniformed personnel subject to this chapter that willfully disobeys a lawful order of enforcement by a superior court pursuant to this section and RCW 41.80.360, or willfully offers resistance to such order, whether by strike or otherwise, is in contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW. An employer that willfully disobeys a lawful order of enforcement by a superior court pursuant to RCW 41.80.360 or willfully offers resistance to such order is in contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.

[ 2019 c 234 s 10.]